Maine, session 132, LD239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §13751, sub-§2, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. Remote dispensing site;
Sec. 2. Maine Board of Pharmacy to adopt rules. No later than June 30, 2026,
as authorized by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section 13751, subsection 2,
paragraph A-1, the Maine Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules to establish the criteria that
a remote dispensing site must meet to qualify for licensure. The rules must, at a minimum,
require a demonstration that the geographic area in which the remote dispensing site is to
be located lacks adequate access to retail pharmacy services for the general public;
authorize a licensed pharmacist to provide supervision, drug regimen review and patient
counseling through telehealth services under Title 32, chapter 117, subchapter 15; set
minimum staffing levels for pharmacy technicians at the remote dispensing site; and
establish procedures for record keeping, security and surveillance. The operation of a
remote dispensing site by a retail pharmacy is not permitted until rules are adopted by the
board pursuant to Title 32, section 13751, subsection 3 and this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR0374(03)